Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.68.011

Prevention and correction of ballot frauds and errors.

Any justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior court in the proper county shall, by order, require any person charged with error, wrongful act, or neglect to forthwith correct the error, desist from the wrongful act, or perform the duty and to do as the court orders or to show cause forthwith why the error should not be corrected, the wrongful act desisted from, or the duty or order not performed, whenever it is made to appear to such justice or judge by affidavit of an elector that:

(1) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in printing the name of any candidate on official ballots; or

(2) An error other than as provided in subsections (1) and (3) of this section has been committed or is about to be committed in printing the ballots; or

(3) The name of any person has been or is about to be wrongfully placed upon the ballots.

An affidavit of an elector under this section when relating to a primary election must be filed with the appropriate court no later than two days following the closing of the filing period for such office and shall be heard and finally disposed of by the court not later than five days after the filing thereof. An affidavit of an elector under this section when relating to a general election must be filed with the appropriate court no later than three days following the official certification of the primary election returns, or official certification of candidates qualified to appear on the general election ballot, whichever is later, and shall be heard and finally disposed of by the court not later than five days after the filing thereof.

[ 2016 c 130 s 1; 2013 c 11 s 71; 2011 c 349 s 25; 2007 c 374 s 3; 2005 c 243 s 22; 2004 c 271 s 182.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.